Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Georgia Data Access Forum

31-53-20.
Legislative findings; public policy declaration.

The General Assembly finds that:

Cost of care, diagnostic metrics, care gaps, and best practices are best analyzed with large-scale data;

The current data infrastructure must be adapted to adequately integrate state and private resources in a manner that will serve the divergent needs of the state;

All components of state data collection and dissemination infrastructure must be more strategic and better coordinated to serve policy makers and health care providers; and

A more robust data base will also serve as a platform to provide resources to the public for healthy living and cost transparency.

The General Assembly, therefore, declares it to be the public policy of this state to unite the major stakeholders of the state’s health care system under a common data platform. The public policy of the state will be served by restructuring data silos to inform policy makers, health care providers, and consumers.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-2/HB 186.

31-53-21.
Establishment of Georgia Data Access Forum; composition; membership.

The office shall convene a Georgia Data Access Forum composed of health care stakeholders and experts, including representatives from:

The Georgia Health Information Network;

Hospital associations;

Physician associations;

Pharmacy associations;

Dental associations;

The Department of Community Health;

The Department of Public Health;

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities;

The Insurance Commissioner’s Office;

Insurance carriers; and

Self-insured employers.

Membership on the Georgia Data Access Forum shall not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

Members shall serve without compensation, although each member shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties from funds available to the office. Such reimbursement shall be limited to all travel and other expenses necessarily incurred through service on the forum, in compliance with this state’s travel rules and regulations; provided, however, that in no case shall a member be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the member’s capacity as the representative of another state agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-2/HB 186.

31-53-22.
Purpose.

The purpose of the Georgia Data Access Forum shall be to make recommendations to the office on:

Conducting a baseline analysis of the current data base infrastructure;

Identifying common goals for the state and stakeholders;

Prioritizing desired data base functions;

Securing proposals for data base platforms;

Analyzing existing systems and technology that can be leveraged into a streamlined system;

Analyzing system security and available data that can be leveraged into a streamlined system;

Estimating and evaluating costs to various stakeholders;

Establishing a timeline for implementation;

Determining whether a tiered approach is necessary for implementation;

Establishing a timeline for a tiered roll out;

Establishing a short-term and long-term approach to funding the data base;

Identifying appropriate funding sources other than the general fund;

Recommending legislation necessary for data security;

Recommending legislation necessary for stakeholder cooperation or protection;

Recommending legislation necessary to capture data;

Determining the appropriate agency or entity to manage the ongoing operation of the data base;

Describing the relative benefits to the various stakeholders;

Identifying population health tools; and

Determining the cost, feasibility, and timeframe to implement a consumer health cost tool.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-2/HB 186.

31-53-23.
Consultation with third party vendors.

Third-party vendors may be contacted for expertise at the director’s discretion to assist the Georgia Data Access Forum in formulating its recommendations pursuant to Code Section 31-53-22.

Third-party vendors may be consulted and permitted to offer proposals and make presentations to the office and the Georgia Data Access Forum.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-2/HB 186.